Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES Section 1. new text begin HUMAN SERVICES FORECAST ADJUSTMENTS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to or, if shown in parentheses, subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 20, and Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 9, article 12, to the commissioner of human services from the general fund or other named fund for the purposes specified in section 2 and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the addition to or subtraction from the appropriation listed under them is available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN SERVICES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 739,634,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 775,035,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General Fund new text end new text begin 652,953,000 new text end new text begin 615,407,000 new text end new text begin Health Care Access Fund new text end new text begin 86,681,000 new text end new text begin 159,628,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Forecasted Programs new text end new text begin (a) General Assistance new text end new text begin 7,909,000 new text end new text begin 9,653,000 new text end new text begin (b) Minnesota Supplemental Aid new text end new text begin 2,976,000 new text end new text begin 3,233,000 new text end new text begin (c) Housing Support new text end new text begin 29,593,000 new text end new text begin 44,727,000 new text end new text begin (d) MinnesotaCare new text end new text begin 86,681,000 new text end new text begin 159,628,000 new text end new text begin These appropriations are from the health care access fund. new text end new text begin (e) Medical Assistance new text end new text begin 589,777,000 new text end new text begin 525,140,000 new text end new text begin (f) Behavioral Health Fund new text end new text begin 22,698,000 new text end new text begin 32,654,000 new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This article is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 2 DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES Section 1. new text begin CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES FORECAST ADJUSTMENTS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to or, if shown in parentheses, subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 22, to the commissioner of children, youth, and families from the general fund or other named fund for the purposes specified in section 2 and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the addition to or subtraction from the appropriation listed under them is available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin COMMISSIONER OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin (45,161,000) new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin (36,451,000) new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General Fund new text end new text begin (22,395,000) new text end new text begin (10,320,000) new text end new text begin Federal TANF new text end new text begin (22,766,000) new text end new text begin (26,131,000) new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Forecasted Programs new text end new text begin (a) MFIP/DWP new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General Fund new text end new text begin (7,245,000) new text end new text begin (3,125,000) new text end new text begin Federal TANF new text end new text begin (22,766,000) new text end new text begin (26,131,000) new text end new text begin (b) MFIP Child Care Assistance new text end new text begin (26,220,000) new text end new text begin (18,822,000) new text end new text begin (c) Northstar Care for Children new text end new text begin 11,070,000 new text end new text begin 11,627,000 new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This article is effective the day following final enactment. new text end